Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.3. Stormwater Management Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:37.1.
Inspections; land-disturbing activities of natural gas pipelines; stop work instructions.

The Department is authorized to conduct inspections of the land-disturbing activities of interstate and intrastate natural gas pipeline companies that have approved annual standards and specifications pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:31

as such land-disturbing activities relate to construction of any natural gas transmission pipeline equal to or greater than 24 inches inside diameter to determine (i) compliance with such annual standards and specifications, (ii) compliance with any site-specific plans, and (iii) if there have been or are likely to be adverse impacts to water quality as a result of such land-disturbing activities, including instances where (a) there has been a violation of any water quality standard adopted pursuant to the State Water Control Law (§

62.1-44.2

et seq.), (b) sediment has been deposited in significant amounts in areas where those deposits are not contained by best management practices, (c) there are repeated instances of adverse impacts or likely adverse impacts within a 30-day period, or (d) there have been widespread and repeated instances of adverse impacts or likely impacts. When the Department determines that there has been a substantial adverse impact to water quality or that an imminent and substantial adverse impact to water quality is likely to occur as a result of such land-disturbing activities, the Department may issue a stop work instruction, without advance notice or hearing, requiring that all or part of such land-disturbing activities on the part of the site that caused the substantial adverse impacts to water quality or are likely to cause imminent and substantial adverse impacts to water quality be stopped until corrective measures specified in the stop work instruction have been completed and approved by the Department. Where substantial adverse impacts or likely adverse impacts are found on a repeated, frequent, and widespread basis, the Department may issue a stop work instruction for every work area in Virginia until the Department determines that any systemic cause that contributed to such occurrences has been corrected.Such stop work instruction shall become effective upon service on the company by email or other technology agreed to in writing by the Department and the company, by mailing with confirmation of delivery to the address specified in the annual standards and specifications, if available, or by delivery at the site to a person previously identified to the Department by the company. Upon request by the company, the Director or his designee shall review such stop work instruction within 48 hours of issuance.

Within 10 business days of issuance of a stop work instruction, the Department shall promptly provide to such company an opportunity for an informal fact-finding proceeding concerning the stop work instruction and any review by the Director or his designee. Reasonable notice as to the time and place of the informal fact-finding proceeding shall be provided to such company. Within 10 business days of the informal fact-finding proceeding, the Department shall affirm, modify, amend, or cancel such stop work instruction. Upon written documentation from the company of the completion and approval by the Department in writing of the corrective measures specified in the stop work instruction, the instruction shall be immediately lifted.

The company may appeal such stop work instruction or preliminary decision rendered by the Director or his designee to the circuit court of the jurisdiction wherein the land-disturbing activities subject to the stop work instruction occurred, or to another appropriate court, in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Any person violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey a stop work instruction issued by the Department may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in the circuit court of the jurisdiction wherein the violation was alleged to have occurred or other appropriate court to obey same and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Board or the Department from taking any other action authorized by this chapter.

History.

2018, c. 298; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 277.

Effective date.

This section is effective March 10, 2018, by emergency clause.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 277, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “transmission pipeline equal to or greater than 24 inches” for “transmission pipeline greater than 36 inches,” inserted “including instances where (a) there has been a violation of any water quality standard adopted pursuant to the State Water Control Law (§

62.1-44.2

et seq.), (b) sediment has been deposited in significant amounts in areas where those deposits are not contained by best management practices, (c) there are repeated instances of adverse impacts or likely adverse impacts within a 30-day period, or (d) there have been widespread and repeated instances of adverse impacts or likely impacts” and added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

§ 62.1-44.15:38.
(For repeal date — see notes) Department to review VSMPs.

The Department shall develop and implement a review and evaluation schedule so that the effectiveness of each VSMP authority, Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System Management Program, and other MS4 permit requirements is evaluated no less than every five years. The review shall include an assessment of the extent to which the program has reduced nonpoint source pollution and mitigated the detrimental effects of localized flooding. Such reviews shall be coordinated with those being implemented in accordance with the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.) and associated regulations and, where applicable, the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.) and associated regulations.

Following completion of a compliance review of a VSMP, the Department shall provide results and compliance recommendations to the Board in the form of a corrective action agreement if deficiencies are found; otherwise, the Board may find the program compliant. If, after such a review and evaluation, a VSMP is found to have a program that does not comply with the provisions of this article or regulations adopted thereunder, the Board shall establish a schedule for the VSMP authority to come into compliance. The Board shall provide a copy of its decision to the VSMP authority that specifies the deficiencies, actions needed to be taken, and the approved compliance schedule. If the VSMP has not implemented the necessary compliance actions identified by the Board within 30 days following receipt of the corrective action agreement, or such additional period as is granted to complete the implementation of the corrective action, then the Board shall have the authority to (i) issue a special order to any VSMP imposing a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 per day with the maximum amount not to exceed $20,000 per violation for noncompliance with the requirements of this article and its regulations, to be paid into the state treasury and deposited in the Virginia Stormwater Management Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29

or (ii) revoke its approval of the VSMP. The Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall govern the activities and proceedings of the Board under this article and the judicial review thereof.If the Board revokes its approval of a VSMP, the Board shall find the VSMP authority provisional and shall have the Department assist with the administration of the program until the VSMP authority is deemed compliant with the requirements of this article and associated regulations. Assisting with administration includes the ability to review and comment on plans to the VSMP authority, to conduct inspections with the VSMP authority, and to conduct enforcement in accordance with this article and associated regulations.In lieu of issuing a special order or revoking the program, the Board may take legal action against a VSMP pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:48

to ensure compliance.

History.

1989, cc. 467, 499, § 10.1-603.12; 2004, c. 372; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:39.
(For expiration date — see notes)
Right of entry.

The Department, the VSMP authority, where authorized to enforce this article, any duly authorized agent of the Department or VSMP authority, or any locality that is the operator of a regulated municipal separate storm sewer system may, at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances, enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations necessary in the enforcement of the provisions of this article. For operators of municipal separate storm sewer systems, this authority shall apply only to those properties from which a discharge enters their municipal separate storm sewer systems.

In accordance with a performance bond with surety, cash escrow, letter of credit, any combination thereof, or such other legal arrangement, a VSMP authority may also enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purpose of initiating or maintaining appropriate actions that are required by the permit conditions associated with a land-disturbing activity when a permittee, after proper notice, has failed to take acceptable action within the time specified.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:1; 2011, c. 453; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:39

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

§ 62.1-44.15:39.
(For effective date — see notes) Right of entry.

In addition to the Board’s authority set forth in §

62.1-44.20

, a locality serving as a VESMP authority or any duly authorized agent thereof may, at reasonable times and under reasonable circumstances, enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations necessary in the enforcement of the provisions of this article. For localities that operate regulated municipal separate storm sewer systems, this authority shall apply only to those properties from which a discharge enters their municipal separate storm sewer systems.

In accordance with a performance bond with surety, cash escrow, letter of credit, any combination thereof, or such other legal arrangement, a VESMP authority may also enter any establishment or upon any property, public or private, for the purpose of initiating or maintaining appropriate actions that are required by conditions imposed by the VESMP authority on a land-disturbing activity when an owner, after proper notice, has failed to take acceptable action within the time specified.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:1; 2011, c. 453; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:39

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and substituted “In addition to the Board’s authority set forth in §

62.1-44.20

, a locality serving as a VESMP authority or any duly authorized agent thereof” for “The Department, the VSMP authority, where authorized to enforce this article, any duly authorized agent of the Department or VSMP authority, or any locality that is the operator of a regulated municipal separate storm sewer system” in the first sentence and “localities that operate regulated” for “operators of,” in the second sentence; and in the second paragraph, substituted “VESMP” for “VSMP,” “conditions imposed by the VESMP authority on” for “the permit conditions associated with,” and “an owner” for “a permittee.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:40.
(For expiration date — see notes) Information to be furnished.

The Board, the Department, or the VSMP authority, where authorized to enforce this article, may require every permit applicant, every permittee, or any person subject to state permit requirements under this article to furnish when requested such application materials, plans, specifications, and other pertinent information as may be necessary to determine the effect of his discharge on the quality of state waters, or such other information as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article. Any personal information shall not be disclosed except to an appropriate official of the Board, Department, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, or VSMP authority or as may be authorized pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). However, disclosure of records of the Department, the Board, or the VSMP authority relating to (i) active federal environmental enforcement actions that are considered confidential under federal law, (ii) enforcement strategies, including proposed sanctions for enforcement actions, and (iii) any secret formulae, secret processes, or secret methods other than effluent data used by any permittee or under that permittee’s direction is prohibited. Upon request, such enforcement records shall be disclosed after a proposed sanction resulting from the investigation has been determined by the Department, the Board, or the VSMP authority. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the disclosure of records related to inspection reports, notices of violation, and documents detailing the nature of any land-disturbing activity that may have occurred, or similar documents.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:2; 2005, c. 102; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:40

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

§ 62.1-44.15:40.
(For effective date — see notes) Information to be furnished.

The Board, the Department, or a locality serving as a VESMP authority may require every owner, including every applicant for a permit or land-disturbance approval, to furnish when requested such application materials, plans, specifications, and other pertinent information as may be necessary to determine the effect of his discharge on the quality of state waters, or such other information as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this article. The Board or Department also may require any locality that is a VESMP authority to furnish when requested any information as may be required to accomplish the purposes of this article. Any personal information shall not be disclosed except to an appropriate official of the Board, Department, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, or VESMP authority or as may be authorized pursuant to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.). However, disclosure of records of the Department, the Board, or the VESMP authority relating to (i) active federal environmental enforcement actions that are considered confidential under federal law, (ii) enforcement strategies, including proposed sanctions for enforcement actions, and (iii) any secret formulae, secret processes, or secret methods other than effluent data used by any owner or under that owner’s direction is prohibited. Upon request, such enforcement records shall be disclosed after a proposed sanction resulting from the investigation has been determined by the Board or the locality serving as a VESMP authority. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the disclosure of records related to inspection reports, notices of violation, and documents detailing the nature of any land-disturbing activity that may have occurred, or similar documents.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:2; 2005, c. 102; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:40

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and substituted “a locality serving as a VESMP authority may require every owner, including every applicant for a permit or land-disturbance approval” for “the VSMP authority, where authorized to enforce this article, may require every permit applicant, every permittee, or any person subject to state permit requirements under this article” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, substituted “VESMP” for “VSMP” in the third and fourth sentences, substituted “owner” for “permittee” or a variant twice in the fourth sentence, and substituted “the Board or the locality serving as a VESMP authority” for “the Department, the Board, or the VSMP authority” in the fifth sentence. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:41.
(For expiration date — see notes) Private rights; liability.

Whenever a common interest community cedes responsibility for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of a stormwater management facility on its real property to the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof, such common interest community shall be immune from civil liability in relation to such stormwater management facility. In order for the immunity established by this subsection to apply, (i) the common interest community must cede such responsibility by contract or other instrument executed by both parties and (ii) the Commonwealth or the governing body of the political subdivision shall have accepted the responsibility ceded by the common interest community in writing or by resolution. As used in this section, maintenance, repair, and replacement shall include, without limitation, cleaning of the facility, maintenance of adjacent grounds that are part of the facility, maintenance and replacement of fencing where the facility is fenced, and posting of signage indicating the identity of the governmental entity that maintains the facility. Acceptance or approval of an easement, subdivision plat, site plan, or other plan of development shall not constitute the acceptance by the Commonwealth or the governing body of the political subdivision required to satisfy clause (ii). The immunity granted by this section shall not apply to actions or omissions by the common interest community constituting intentional or willful misconduct or gross negligence. For the purposes of this section, “common interest community” means the same as that term is defined in §

54.1-2345

.

Except as provided in subsection A, the fact that any permittee holds or has held a permit or state permit issued under this article shall not constitute a defense in any civil action involving private rights.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:3; 2010, c. 853; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect at that time, see the following section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:41

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, cc. 756 and
793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “54.1-2345” for “55-528.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-819 Hazardous Materials.

§ 62.1-44.15:41.
(For effective date — see notes) Liability of common interest communities.

Whenever a common interest community cedes responsibility for the maintenance, repair, and replacement of a stormwater management facility on its real property to the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof, such common interest community shall be immune from civil liability in relation to such stormwater management facility. In order for the immunity established by this subsection to apply, (i) the common interest community must cede such responsibility by contract or other instrument executed by both parties and (ii) the Commonwealth or the governing body of the political subdivision shall have accepted the responsibility ceded by the common interest community in writing or by resolution. As used in this section, maintenance, repair, and replacement shall include, without limitation, cleaning of the facility, maintenance of adjacent grounds that are part of the facility, maintenance and replacement of fencing where the facility is fenced, and posting of signage indicating the identity of the governmental entity that maintains the facility. Acceptance or approval of an easement, subdivision plat, site plan, or other plan of development shall not constitute the acceptance by the Commonwealth or the governing body of the political subdivision required to satisfy clause (ii). The immunity granted by this section shall not apply to actions or omissions by the common interest community constituting intentional or willful misconduct or gross negligence. For the purposes of this section, “common interest community” means the same as that term is defined in §

54.1-2345

.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:3; 2010, c. 853; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For this section as in effect until that time, see the preceding section, also numbered

62.1-44.15:41

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 ( §

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act ( §

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts
2016, cc. 68 and
758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts
2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 68 and 758 are identical, and deleted the subsection A designation and deleted subsection B, which read “Except as provided in subsection A, the fact that any permittee holds or has held a permit or state permit issued under this article shall not constitute a defense in any civil action involving private rights.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

§ 62.1-44.15:42.
(For repeal date — see notes) Enforcement by injunction, etc.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to comply with any stop work order, emergency order issued in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:37

, or a special order or emergency special order issued in accordance with §

62.1-44.15:25

that has become final under the provisions of this article. Any person violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey any rule, regulation, ordinance, approved standard and specification, order, or permit condition issued by the Board, Department, or VSMP authority as authorized to do such, or any provisions of this article, may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in any appropriate court by the Board, Department, or VSMP authority where authorized to enforce this article to obey same and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy.

Any person violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey any injunction, mandamus, or other remedy obtained pursuant to this section shall be subject, in the discretion of the court, to a civil penalty in accordance with the provisions of §

62.1-44.15:48

.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:4; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:43.
(For repeal date — see notes) Testing validity of regulations; judicial review.

The validity of any regulation adopted by the Board pursuant to this article may be determined through judicial review in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

An appeal may be taken from the decision of the court to the Court of Appeals as provided by law.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:5; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

§ 62.1-44.15:44.
(For repeal date — see notes) Right to hearing.

Any permit applicant, permittee, or person subject to state permit requirements under this article aggrieved by any action of the Department or Board taken without a formal hearing, or by inaction of the Department or Board, may demand in writing a formal hearing by the Board, provided a petition requesting such hearing is filed with the Board within 30 days after notice of such action.

History.

2004, c. 372, § 10.1-603.12:6; 2012, cc. 785, 819; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, cc. 303, 598.

Contingent repeal date.

This section is repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption of regulations required by Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 5 provides: “That the transfer of the responsibility for administering the issuance and enforcement of national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges shall become effective on July 1, 2013, or upon the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, whichever occurs later.” Pursuant to a letter received from the Environmental Protection Agency on July 2, 2013, the transfer of responsibility from DCR to DEQ has been approved as required by this provision.

Acts 2014, cc. 303 and 598, cl. 2 provides: “That amendments to regulations of the State Water Control Board necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), provided that there is a public comment period of at least 30 days on the proposed amendments prior to Board adoption.”

Acts 2014, cc. 303 and 598, cl. 3 provides: “That the consolidation into Virginia’s General Permit for Discharges of Stormwater from Construction Activities of state post-construction requirements exceeding minimum federal requirements shall not be construed to modify the scope of federal agency or citizen suit enforcement pursuant to the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.).”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 303, effective March 24, 2014, and c. 598, effective April 4, 2014, deleted “VSMP authority” twice preceding “Department or Board” and “or VSMP authority causing such grievance” following “by the Board,” and “or the VSMP authority” following “with the Board.”